Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4714.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 15a. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapters 500 to 550 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 500.1325(3) Pub trst E Insurance code ? knowingly misrepresenting false financial condition 5 500.1371 Pub trst H Holding companies ? violation 2 500.1505(2) Pub trst C Insurance code ? license and regulatory violations 15 500.4511(1) 500.4511(2) Pub trst FE Insurance code ? fraudulent insurance act 45 500.4511(3) Pub trst D Insurance code ? fraudulent insurance act 10 500.4511(2) 500.4511(4) Pub trst DC Insurance fraud ? agreement or conspiracy to commitcode - fraudulent insurance act 1015 500.4511(5) Pub trst B Insurance code ? fraudulent insurance act 20 500.5252(4) Property G Insurance ? improper personal interest in transactions 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 500.7034(2) Pub trst E Officer of a MEWA knowingly receive valuables for sale property or loan 10 500.8197(2) Pub trst C Insurance ? knowing or willful false statements in application for insurance 15 500.8197(3) Property E Consolidation merger ? compensation otherwise than expressed in contract 5 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4716 (request no. H01729'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.